Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1336
Department; political subdivision; access highways; construction, maintenance, location, vacation; agreement.

The department and the governing bodies of any political or governmental subdivision or any public corporation of this state may enter into agreements with each other respecting the planning, designating, financing, establishing, constructing, improving, maintaining, using, altering, relocating, regulating, or vacating of controlled-access roads except any toll facilities.

Laws 1955, c. 148, § 36, p. 433.

Department of Roads and cities may make agreements with respect to controlled access facilities. Hammer v. Department of Roads, 175 Neb. 178, 120 N.W.2d 909 (1963).